Washington statutes.
RCW 4.22.020

Imputation of contributory fault—Spouse, domestic partner, or minor child of spouse or domestic partner—Wrongful death actions.

The contributory fault of one spouse or one domestic partner shall not be imputed to the other spouse or other domestic partner or the minor child of the spouse or domestic partner to diminish recovery in an action by the other spouse or other domestic partner or the minor child of the spouse or other domestic partner, or his or her legal representative, to recover damages caused by fault resulting in death or in injury to the person or property, whether separate or community, of the spouse or domestic partner. In an action brought for wrongful death or loss of consortium, the contributory fault of the decedent or injured person shall be imputed to the claimant in that action.

[ 2008 c 6 s 401; 1987 c 212 s 801; 1981 c 27 s 10; 1973 1st ex.s. c 138 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Wrongful death actions: Chapter 4.20 RCW.